Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1
INSURANCE IN GENERAL

5-4-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as "Uniform Consumer Credit Code - Insurance".

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1225, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-101, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-102. Scope - relation to credit insurance act - applicability to parties.

This article applies to insurance provided or to be provided in relation to a consumer credit transaction.

This article supplements and does not repeal the "Credit Insurance Act", article 10 of title 10, C.R.S. The provisions of this code concerning administrative controls, liabilities, and penalties do not apply to persons acting as insurers, and the similar provisions of the "Credit Insurance Act" do not apply to creditors and consumers.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1225, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-102, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-103. Definitions - "consumer credit insurance" - "Credit Insurance Act".

As used in this code, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consumer credit insurance" means insurance, other than insurance on property, by which the satisfaction of debt in whole or in part is a benefit provided but does not include:

Insurance, as to which a finance charge is imposed and provided in relation to a credit transaction in which a payment is scheduled more than ten years after the extension of credit;

Insurance issued as an isolated transaction on the part of the insurer not related to an agreement or plan for insuring consumers of the creditor; or

Insurance indemnifying the creditor against loss due to the consumer's default.

"Credit Insurance Act" means the "Credit Insurance Act", article 10 of title 10, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1225, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-103, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-104. Creditor's provision of and charge for insurance - excess amount of charge.

Except as otherwise provided in this article and subject to the provisions on additional charges contained in section 5-2-202 and maximum charges contained in section 5-2-201, a creditor may agree to provide insurance and may contract for and receive a charge for insurance separate from and in addition to other charges. A creditor need not make a separate charge for insurance provided or required by the creditor. This code does not authorize the issuance of any insurance prohibited under any statute, or rule thereunder, governing the business of insurance.

The excess amount of a charge for insurance provided for in agreements in violation of this article is an excess charge for the purposes of:

The provisions on remedies and penalties contained in article 5 of this title as to effect of violations on rights of parties under section 5-5-201; and

The provisions on administration contained in article 6 of this title as to civil actions by the administrator under section 5-6-114.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1225, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-104, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-105. Conditions applying to insurance to be provided by creditor.

If a creditor agrees with a consumer to provide insurance:

The insurance shall be evidenced by an individual policy or certificate of insurance delivered to the consumer or sent to the consumer at his or her address as stated by the consumer within thirty days after the term of the insurance commences under the agreement between the creditor and consumer; or

The creditor shall promptly notify the consumer of any failure or delay in providing the insurance.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1226, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-105, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-106. Unconscionability.

In applying the provisions of this code on unconscionability contained in sections 5-5-109 and 5-6-112 to a separate charge for insurance, consideration shall be given, among other factors, to:

Potential benefits to the consumer including the satisfaction of the consumer's obligations;

The creditor's need for the protection provided by the insurance; and

The relation between the amount and terms of credit granted and the insurance benefits provided.

If consumer credit insurance otherwise complies with this article and other applicable law, neither the amount nor the term of the insurance nor the amount of a charge therefor is in itself unconscionable.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1226, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-106, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-107. Maximum charge by creditor for insurance.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, if a creditor contracts for or receives a separate charge for insurance, the amount charged to the consumer for the insurance may not exceed the premium to be charged by the insurer as computed at the time the charge to the consumer is determined conforming to any rate filings required by law and made by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance.

A creditor who provides consumer credit insurance in relation to a revolving credit account may calculate the charge to the consumer in each billing cycle by applying the current premium rate to:

The average daily unpaid balance of the debt in the cycle;

The unpaid balance of the debt or a median amount within a specified range of unpaid balances of debt on approximately the same day of the cycle. The day of the cycle need not be the day used in calculating the finance charge, but the specified range shall be the range used for that purpose; or

The unpaid balances of the amount financed calculated according to the actuarial method.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1227, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-107, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-108. Refund or credit required - amount.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, an appropriate refund or credit of unearned premiums shall be made to the person entitled thereto with respect to any separate charge made to the consumer for insurance if:

The insurance is not provided or is provided for a shorter term than that for which the charge to the consumer for insurance was computed; or

The insurance terminates prior to the end of the term for which it was written because of prepayment in full of the indebtedness or the insurance terminates for any other reason.

All consumer credit insurance shall terminate upon prepayment in full of the indebtedness.

If a refund or credit of unearned premiums is required pursuant to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section:

The original creditor, if he or she is the holder of the indebtedness at the time of prepayment, shall either promptly make the appropriate refund or credit or shall promptly notify the consumer and the insurer in writing that a refund or credit is due. Upon the receipt of notice that a refund or credit is due, the insurer shall promptly make an appropriate refund or credit of unearned premiums pursuant to the provisions of section 10-10-110 (2), C.R.S. For purposes of this section, "original creditor" means the person to whom the indebtedness was initially payable, and "insurer" means every person engaged as principal, indemnitor, surety, or contractor in the business of making contracts of insurance, excluding any licensed insurance agent.

The assignee, if the indebtedness has been assigned, shall either promptly make the appropriate refund or credit or shall promptly notify the consumer, the original creditor, and the insurer, if known, in writing that a refund or credit is due. For the purposes of this section, "assignee" means a person other than the original creditor who at the time of prepayment holds the indebtedness.

The original creditor, upon receipt of notice pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b), shall either promptly make the appropriate refund or credit or shall promptly notify the insurer in writing that a refund or credit of unearned premiums is due.

The insurer, upon the receipt of notice that a refund or credit is due pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (2), shall make an appropriate refund or credit of unearned premiums pursuant to the provisions of section 10-10-110 (2), C.R.S., and subsection (1) of this section.

An assignee or original creditor gives notice pursuant to this section upon delivery or mailing of the notice to the last address provided to him or her. Once an original creditor or an assignee has notified the appropriate party, as provided in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2), the original creditor and the assignee shall have no further obligations.

This article does not require a refund or credit of unearned premiums if:

All refunds and credits due to the debtor under this article amount to less than one dollar; or

The charge for insurance is computed from time to time on the outstanding balance of the indebtedness and the charge relates to only one premium period.

Except as otherwise required, a refund or credit is not required because:

The insurance is terminated by payment of proceeds under the policy; or

The original creditor or assignee pays or accounts for premiums to the insurer in the amounts and at the times determined by the agreement between them; or

The original creditor or assignee receives directly or indirectly under any policy of insurance a gain or advantage not prohibited by law.

If a single type of insurance is terminated by the payment of proceeds under the policy pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (4) of this section, a refund or credit of unearned premiums for all other types of consumer credit insurance issued on the same indebtedness shall be made if so required by the provisions of this section and section 10-10-110 (2), C.R.S.

A refund or credit required by subsection (1) of this section is appropriate as to amount if it is computed according to a method prescribed or approved by the commissioner of insurance or a formula filed by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance at least thirty days before the consumer's right to a refund or credit becomes determinable unless the method or formula is employed after the commissioner of insurance notifies the insurer that he or she disapproves it.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1227, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-108, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-109. Existing insurance - choice of insurer.

If a creditor requires insurance, upon notice to the creditor the consumer shall have the option of providing the required insurance through an existing policy of insurance owned or controlled by the consumer or through a policy to be obtained and paid for by the consumer, but the creditor may for reasonable cause decline the insurance provided by the consumer.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1229, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-109, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-110. Charge for insurance in connection with a deferral, refinancing, or consolidation - duplicate charges.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance in connection with a deferral described in section 5-2-204, a refinancing described in section 5-2-205, or a consolidation described in section 5-2-206 unless:

The consumer agrees at or before the time of the deferral, refinancing, or consolidation that the charge may be made;

The consumer is or is to be provided with insurance for an amount or a term, or insurance of a kind, in addition to that to which the consumer would have been entitled had there been no deferral, refinancing, or consolidation;

The consumer receives a refund or credit on account of any unexpired term of existing insurance in the amount that would be required if the insurance were terminated under section 5-4-108; and

The charge does not exceed the amount permitted under section 5-4-107.

A creditor may not contract for or receive a separate charge for insurance that duplicates insurance with respect to which the creditor has previously contracted for or received a separate charge.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1229, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-110, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-111. Cooperation between administrator and commissioner of insurance.

The administrator and the commissioner of insurance are authorized and directed to consult and assist one another in maintaining compliance with this article. They may jointly pursue investigations, prosecute suits, and take other official action, as may seem to them appropriate, if either of them is otherwise empowered to take the action. If the administrator is informed of a violation or suspected violation by an insurer of this article or of the insurance laws, rules, and regulations of this state, the administrator shall advise the commissioner of insurance of the circumstances.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1229, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-111, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-4-112. Administrative action of commissioner of insurance.

To the extent that the commissioner's responsibility under this article requires, the commissioner of insurance shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., with respect to insurers, and with respect to refunds described in section 5-4-108, and, in case of violation, may make an order for compliance.

Sections 24-4-102 to 24-4-106, C.R.S., apply to and govern all administrative action taken by the commissioner of insurance pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1230, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1895, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-4-112, as it existed prior to 2000.